test/src/morphology/N-xano_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

# In case of stem-final й AccPl ending is ё (not йо).


  Noun - хан: # Noun 'sledge' - full paradigm /Type 11/
     хан+N+Sg+Nom: хан
     хан+N+Sg+Acc: ханмʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Gen: ханʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Dat: хананʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Loc: ханхана
     хан+N+Sg+Abl: ханхад
     хан+N+Sg+Pros: ханувна
     хан+N+Du+Nom: ханхаʼ
     хан+N+Du+Acc: ханхаʼ
     хан+N+Du+Gen: ханхаʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Nom: ханˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Acc: хано #! -ь + о = ё (нянь > нянё), й + о = ё
     хан+N+Pl+Gen: ханоˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Dat: ханхаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Loc: ханхаˮна
     хан+N+Pl+Abl: ханхат
     хан+N+Pl+Pros: ханоˮмана    

     хан+N+Tra: ханӈэ
     хан+N+Car: хансиˮ
     хан+N+Equ: хандаремʼ
     хан+N+Equ+Lat: хандаревʼ

# Possessive forms 

     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [ханав, ханув] 
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ханар  
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ханда 
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ханмиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ханриʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: хандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ханваˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ханраˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: хандоʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [ханав, ханув]    
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ханамд  
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: ханамда 
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: ханмиʼ 
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: ханмдиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: ханмдиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ханваˮ 
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: ханмдаˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: ханмдоʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: ханан
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: хананд  
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: хананда 
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ханниʼ 
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: ханндиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: ханндиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ханнаˮ 
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: ханндаˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: ханндоʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: ханхан   
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: ханханд  
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ханханда 
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: ханханиʼ 
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: ханхандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: ханхандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: ханханаˮ 
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: ханхандаˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: ханхандоʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: ханханан   
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ханхананд  
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ханхананда 
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: ханхананиʼ 
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: ханханандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: ханханандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ханхананаˮ 
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: ханханандаˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ханханандоʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: ханхадан   
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ханхаданд  
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: ханхаданда 
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: ханхаданиʼ 
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: ханхадандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: ханхадандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: ханхаданаˮ 
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: ханхадандаˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ханхадандоʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: ханувнан   
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ханувнанд  
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ханувнанда 
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ханувнаниʼ 
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ханувнандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ханувнандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ханувнанаˮ 
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ханувнандаˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ханувнандоʼ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: ханхаюн  
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: ханхаюд  
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ханхаюда 
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: ханхаюниʼ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: ханхаюдиʼ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: ханхаюдиʼ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ханхаюнаˮ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: ханхаюдаˮ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ханхаюдоʼ
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: ханхаюн  
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: ханхаюд  
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: ханхаюда 
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: ханхаюниʼ
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: ханхаюдиʼ
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: ханхаюдиʼ
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: ханхаюнаˮ
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: ханхаюдаˮ
     хан+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: ханхаюдоʼ
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: ханхаюн  
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: ханхают  
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: ханхаюта 
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: ханхаюниʼ
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: ханхаютиʼ
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: ханхаютиʼ
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: ханхаюнаˮ
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: ханхаютаˮ
     хан+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: ханхаютоʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ханон   
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ханод   
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ханода  
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: ханониʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: ханодиʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: ханодиʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ханонаˮ 
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ханодаˮ 
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ханодоʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: ханон   
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: ханод   
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: ханода  
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: ханониʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: ханодиʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: ханодиʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ханонаˮ 
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ханодаˮ 
     хан+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ханодоʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: ханоˮн  
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ханот   
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ханота  
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: ханоˮниʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: ханотиʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ханотиʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ханоˮнаˮ 
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ханотаˮ 
     хан+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ханотоʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: ханхаˮн 
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: ханхат 
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ханхата 
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: ханхаˮниʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: ханхатиʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: ханхатиʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: ханхаˮнаˮ 
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: ханхатаˮ 
     хан+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: ханхатоʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: ханхаˮнан  
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: ханхаˮнат  
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: ханхаˮната 
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: ханхаˮнаниʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: ханхаˮнатиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: ханхаˮнатиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ханхаˮнанаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: ханхаˮнатаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: ханхаˮнатоʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: ханхатан 
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: ханхатат 
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: ханхатата 
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: ханхатаниʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: ханхататиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: ханхататиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: ханхатанаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: ханхататаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: ханхататоʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: ханоˮманан  
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: ханоˮманат  
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: ханоˮманата 
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: ханоˮмананиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: ханоˮманатиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: ханоˮманатиʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: ханоˮмананаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: ханоˮманатаˮ
     хан+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: ханоˮманатоʼ
     
# Predestinative

     хан+N+Pred+Abs: ханад
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [хандав, хандув] 
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: хандар  
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: хандада
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [хандав, хандув]
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: хандамд
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: хандамда
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: хандан
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: ханданд
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: ханданда
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: хандамиʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: хандариʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: хандадиʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: хандамиʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: хандамдиʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: хандамдиʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: ханданиʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: хандандиʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: хандандиʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: хандаваˮ
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: хандараˮ
     хан+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: хандадоʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: хандаваˮ
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: хандамдаˮ
     хан+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: хандамдоʼ
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: ханданаˮ
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: хандандаˮ
     хан+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: хандандоʼ

# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ханадмʼ
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ханан  
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хан
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ханниʼ
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: хандиʼ
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ханхаʼ
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ханваˮ
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: хандаˮ
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ханˮ  
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: хандамзь
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ханнась 
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ханась   
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ханнинзь
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: хандинзь
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ханханзь
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ханваць 
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: хандаць 
     хан+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ханаць  
                    
# Predicative Possessive forms 
 
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: [ханав, ханув] 
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ханар
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ханда 
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ханмиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ханриʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хандиʼ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ханваˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: ханраˮ
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хандоʼ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ханхаюн  
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ханхаюд  
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ханхаюда 
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ханхаюниʼ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ханхаюдиʼ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ханхаюдиʼ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ханхаюнаˮ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ханхаюдаˮ
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: ханхаюдоʼ
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ханон   
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ханод   
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ханода  
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ханониʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ханодиʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ханодиʼ 
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ханонаˮ 
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ханодаˮ 
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: ханодоʼ 
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ханвась
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ханрась
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хандась
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ханминзь
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ханринзь
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хандинзь
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ханваць
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: ханраць
     хан+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хандонзь
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ханхаюнась
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ханхаюдась
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ханхаюдась
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ханхаюнинзь
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ханхаюдинзь
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ханхаюдинзь
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ханхаюнаць
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ханхаюдаць
     хан+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: ханхаюдонзь
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ханонась
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ханодась
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ханодась
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ханонинзь
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ханодинзь
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ханодинзь
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ханонаць
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ханодаць
     хан+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: ханодонзь     
